North Carolina statutes. Chapter 57D. North Carolina Limited Liability Company Act.
Part 3. Conversion of an LLC.

§ 57D-9-30.
Conversion.

An LLC may convert to a different eligible entity if both of the following requirements are met:

The conversion is permitted by the law that will govern the organization and internal affairs of the surviving entity.

The converting LLC complies with the requirements of this Part and to the extent applicable the law that will govern the organization and internal affairs of the surviving entity.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-9-31.
Plan of conversion.

The converting LLC must approve a written plan of conversion containing the following:

The name of the converting LLC immediately before the conversion.

The name the surviving entity will have, the type of entity it will be, and the jurisdiction whose law will govern its organization and internal affairs when the conversion becomes effective.

The terms and conditions of the conversion.

The manner and basis for converting the ownership interests in the converting LLC into interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving entity or into cash or other property or any combination thereof.

The plan of conversion may contain other provisions pertaining to the conversion.

The provisions of the plan of conversion, other than the provisions required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan of conversion if the plan of conversion provides the manner in which the facts will operate on the affected provisions. The facts may include, for example, any of the following:

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

A determination or action by the converting LLC or by any other person, group, or body.

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the converting LLC is a party or any other agreement or document.

The converting LLC shall provide a copy of the plan of conversion to each member of the converting LLC prior to its approval. Under G.S. 57D-3-03(5), all of the members of the converting LLC must approve the plan of conversion. In addition, any economic interest owner of the converting LLC who because of the conversion will become personally liable upon the conversion for liabilities of the surviving entity, whether arising before or after the conversion, must approve the plan of conversion.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting LLC as provided in subsection (d) of this section, but before the articles of conversion become effective, the plan of conversion may be amended or abandoned as follows:

The plan of conversion may be amended as provided in the plan of conversion or, if not so provided, as approved by the converting LLC in the manner provided in subsection (d) of this section.

The plan of conversion may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, as provided in the plan of conversion or if not so provided as approved by the converting LLC in the manner provided in subsection (d) of this section.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-9-32.
Articles of conversion.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting LLC as provided in

G.S. 57D-9-31

, the converting LLC shall deliver articles of conversion to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of conversion must contain the following information:

The name of the converting LLC immediately before the conversion.

The name the surviving entity will have, the type of entity it will be, and the jurisdiction whose law will govern its organization and internal affairs upon the conversion becoming effective.

The mailing address of the converting LLC immediately before the conversion and, if different, the mailing address the surviving entity will have when the conversion becomes effective.

A statement that a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting LLC as required by law.

If the surviving entity is not authorized to transact business in this State, a statement that the surviving entity (i) consents to service of process in any proceeding based on any cause of action arising in respect of the converting LLC being made on the surviving entity by service on the Secretary of State and (ii) commits to deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of any change in the surviving entity’s mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of process served on the Secretary of State.

If the converting LLC is converting to an eligible entity whose formation, or whose status as a registered limited liability partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-32

, requires the filing of a document by the Secretary of State, then notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, that document must be delivered to and filed by the Secretary of State with the articles of conversion.

If the plan of conversion is abandoned after the articles of conversion have been filed by the Secretary of State, but before the articles of conversion become effective, the converting LLC must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the time the articles of conversion become effective an amendment of the articles of conversion withdrawing the articles of conversion.

The conversion takes effect in accordance with the law that will govern the organization and internal affairs of the surviving entity.

Certificates of conversion must be registered as provided in

G.S. 47-18.1

.

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§ 57D-9-33.
Effects of conversion.

When the conversion takes effect, the following shall occur:

The converting LLC ceases its prior form of organization and continues in existence as the surviving entity.

The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting LLC continues to be vested in the surviving entity without reversion or impairment.

All liabilities of the converting LLC continue as liabilities of the surviving entity.

A proceeding pending by or against the converting LLC remains pending by or against the surviving entity as if the conversion did not occur.

The ownership interests in the converting LLC that are to be converted into equity or beneficial ownership interests, obligations, or securities of the surviving entity or into the right to receive cash or other property are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of ownership interests in the converting LLC are entitled only to the rights provided, including by reference, in the plan of conversion.

The conversion does not affect the liability or absence of liability of any interest owner of the converting LLC for any acts, omissions, or obligations of the converting LLC made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the conversion. A conversion under this Part does not constitute a dissolution or termination of the converting LLC.

If the surviving entity is not a domestic corporation or a domestic limited partnership at the time the conversion takes effect, the surviving entity is deemed to consent to each of the following:

That it may be served with process in this State in any proceeding to enforce any obligation of (i) the converting LLC, if before the conversion the converting LLC was subject to suit in this State on the obligation or (ii) the surviving entity arising from the conversion.

That it has appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any such proceeding. Service of process on the Secretary of State must be made by delivering to the Secretary of State or to any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by G.S. 57D-1-22(b). Upon receipt of service of process on behalf of a surviving entity in the manner provided for in this section, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the surviving entity. If the surviving entity is authorized to transact business in this State, the address for mailing will be its principal office designated in the latest document filed by the Secretary of State that is authorized by law to designate the principal office or, if there is no principal office on file, its registered office. If the surviving entity is not authorized to transact business in this State, the address for mailing will be the mailing address of the surviving entity provided under G.S. 57D-9-32(a)(3).

History.

2013-157, s. 2.

§§ 57D-9-34 through 57D-9-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.